Hawaii, session 2026, SB2810.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 514B-154, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (j) to read as follows: "(j)  Any fee charged to a member to obtain copies of association records under this section shall be reasonable; provided that a reasonable fee shall include administrative and duplicating costs and shall not exceed [$1] 75 cents per page, or portion thereof, except the fee for pages exceeding eight and one-half inches by fourteen inches may exceed [$1] 75 cents per page." SECTION 2.  Section 514B-154.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (e) and (f) to read as follows: "(e)  An association may comply with this section or section 514B-152, 514B-153, or 514B-154 by making the required documents, records, and information available to unit owners or owners' authorized agents for download through an internet site, at the option of each unit owner or owner's authorized agent and at no cost to the unit owner or owner's authorized agent[.]; provided that an association shall make the following documents, or their successor documents, available through an internet site at no cost to unit owners or unit owners' authorized agents: (1)  General ledgers; (2)  Project information form (RR-105C); and (3)  Statement of account. (f) Any fee charged to a unit owner or owner's authorized agent to obtain copies of the association's documents, records, and information, whether maintained, kept, or required to be provided pursuant to this section or section 514B-152, 514B-153, or 514B-154, shall be reasonable; provided that a reasonable fee shall include administrative and duplicating costs and shall not exceed [$1] 75 cents per page, or portion thereof, except that the fee for pages exceeding eight and one-half inches by fourteen inches may exceed [$1] 75 cents per page." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________